Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-2147.01
Cost-benefit analysis; reimbursement.

The Department of Economic Development shall, to the extent that funds are appropriated for such purpose, reimburse applying cities or villages for the fees paid by such cities or villages for the use of the cost-benefit analysis model, developed and approved by the Legislature, for projects using funds authorized by section 18-2147.

Laws 1999, LB 774, § 3;

Laws 2000, LB 1135, § 3.